apertium-sqi.sqi.dix
    <pardef n="l/yej__vblex" c="Class I:IV">
      <e><p><l>yej</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yen</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yen</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yejmë</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yeni</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yejnë</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>eva</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eve</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eu</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yem</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yet</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yen</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>yeja</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yeje</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yente</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yenim</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yenit</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yenin</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>yhem</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yhe</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yhet</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yhemi</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yheti</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yhen</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>eva</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eve</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ye</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yem</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yet</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yen</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>yhesha</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yheshe</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yhyej</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yheshim</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yheshit</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yheshin</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>yej</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yesh</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yejë</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yejme</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yeni</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yejnë</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>efsha</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pio"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>efsh</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pio"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eftë</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pio"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>efshim</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pio"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>efshit</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pio"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>efshin</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pio"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>yekam</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pra"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yeke</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pra"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yeka</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pra"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yekemi</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pra"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yekeni</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pra"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yekan</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pra"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>yekësha</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pia"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yekëshe</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pia"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yekësh</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pia"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yekëshim</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pia"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yekëshit</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pia"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yekëshin</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pia"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>yej</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yeni</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>yer</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yer</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yeri</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yeri</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yeri</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yerit</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yerit</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yerit</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yerit</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yerit</l><r>yej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="lyej"><i>l</i><par n="l/yej__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kryej"><i>kr</i><par n="l/yej__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="çlyej"><i>çl</i><par n="l/yej__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="përlyej"><i>përl</i><par n="l/yej__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="gërryej"><i>gërr</i><par n="l/yej__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="zhgërryej"><i>zhgërr</i><par n="l/yej__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="shqgyej"><i>shqg</i><par n="l/yej__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="thyej"><i>th</i><par n="l/yej__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="përthyej"><i>përth</i><par n="l/yej__vblex"/></e>
